District of Columbia statutes.
14-702

Person presumed dead found living.

If the person presumed to be dead pursuant to section 14-701 is found to be living, a person injured by the presumption shall be restored to the rights of which he was deprived by reason of the presumption.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 522, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 14-702.
1973 Ed., § 14-702.

Prior Codifications